Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.090

Applications for license.

Any person applying for a license to operate a rendering plant and/or substation and/or place of transfer, or to act as an independent collector shall make application on forms furnished by the director. Said application shall give all information required by the director and shall be accompanied by the required license fee.

[ 1949 c 100 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-9.]